Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101, as
last amended by Section 8, Chapter 343, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 2-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101. As used in the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act:
1. "Acute pain" means pain, whether resulting from disease,
accidental trauma, intentional trauma, or other cause that the
practitioner reasonably expects to last only a short period of time.

Acute pain does not include chronic pain, pain being treated as part
of cancer care, hospice or other end-of-life care, or pain being
treated as part of palliative care;
2. "Administer" means the direct application of a controlled
dangerous substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion or
any other means, to the body of a patient, animal or research
subject by:
a. a practitioner (or, in the presence of the
practitioner, by the authorized agent of the
practitioner), or
b. the patient or research subject at the direction and
in the presence of the practitioner;
3. "Agent" means a peace officer appointed by and who acts on
behalf of the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control or an authorized person who acts on behalf
of or at the direction of a person who manufactures, distributes,
dispenses, prescribes, administers or uses for scientific purposes
controlled dangerous substances but does not include a common or
contract carrier, public warehouser or employee thereof, or a person
required to register under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act;
4. "Anhydrous ammonia" means any substance that exhibits
cryogenic evaporative behavior and tests positive for ammonia;
5. "Board" means the Advisory Board to the Director of the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;
6. "Bureau" means the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control;
7. "Chronic pain" means pain that persists beyond the usual
course of an acute disease or healing of an injury. Chronic pain
may or may not be associated with an acute or chronic pathologic
process that causes continuous or intermittent pain over months or
years;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 2

8. "Coca leaves" includes cocaine and any compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of coca
leaves, except derivatives of coca leaves which do not contain
cocaine or ecgonine;
9. "Commissioner" or "Director" means the Director of the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;
10. "Control" means to add, remove or change the placement of a
drug, substance or immediate precursor under the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act;
11. "Controlled dangerous substance" means a drug, substance or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V of the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Act or any drug, substance or
immediate precursor listed either temporarily or permanently as a
federally controlled substance. Any conflict between state and
federal law with regard to the particular schedule in which a
substance is listed shall be resolved in favor of state law;
12. "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance which,
or the container or labeling of which without authorization, bears
the trademark, trade name or other identifying marks, imprint,
number or device or any likeness thereof of a manufacturer,
distributor or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed or dispensed the substance;
13. "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled
dangerous substance or drug paraphernalia, whether or not there is
an agency relationship;
14. "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled dangerous
substance to an ultimate user or human research subject by or
pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the
prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling or compounding
necessary to prepare the substance for such distribution.
"Dispenser" is a practitioner who delivers a controlled dangerous
substance to an ultimate user or human research subject;
15. "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering
or dispensing a controlled dangerous substance;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 3

16. "Distributor" means a commercial entity engaged in the
distribution or reverse distribution of narcotics and dangerous
drugs and who complies with all regulations promulgated by the
federal Drug Enforcement Administration and the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control;
17. "Drug" means articles:
a. recognized in the official United States Pharmacopeia,
official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United
States, or official National Formulary, or any
supplement to any of them,
b. intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment or prevention of disease in man or other
animals,
c. other than food, intended to affect the structure or
any function of the body of man or other animals, and
d. intended for use as a component of any article
specified in this paragraph;
provided, however, the term drug does not include devices or their
components, parts or accessories;
18. "Drug paraphernalia" means all equipment, products, and
materials of any kind which are used, intended for use, or fashioned
specifically for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing,
harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,
processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,
storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or
otherwise introducing into the human body, a controlled dangerous
substance in violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act including, but not limited to:
a. kits used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically
for use in planting, propagating, cultivating,
growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which
is a controlled dangerous substance or from which a
controlled dangerous substance can be derived,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 4

b. kits used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically
for use in manufacturing, compounding, converting,
producing, processing, or preparing controlled
dangerous substances,
c. isomerization devices used, intended for use, or
fashioned specifically for use in increasing the
potency of any species of plant which is a controlled
dangerous substance,
d. testing equipment used, intended for use, or fashioned
specifically for use in identifying or in analyzing
the strength, effectiveness, or purity of controlled
dangerous substances,
e. scales and balances used, intended for use, or
fashioned specifically for use in weighing or
measuring controlled dangerous substances,
f. diluents and adulterants, such as quinine
hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and
lactose used, intended for use, or fashioned
specifically for use in cutting controlled dangerous
substances,
g. separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or
fashioned specifically for use in removing twigs and
seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining,
marijuana,
h. blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing
devices used, intended for use, or fashioned
specifically for use in compounding controlled
dangerous substances,
i. capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers
used, intended for use, or fashioned specifically for
use in packaging small quantities of controlled
dangerous substances,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 5

j. containers and other objects used, intended for use,
or fashioned specifically for use in parenterally
injecting controlled dangerous substances into the
human body,
k. hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used,
intended for use, or fashioned specifically for use in
parenterally injecting controlled dangerous substances
into the human body, except as authorized by Section
2-1101 of this title,
l. objects used, intended for use, or fashioned
specifically for use in ingesting, inhaling, or
otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or
hashish oil into the human body, such as:
(1) metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or
ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent
screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls,
(2) water pipes,
(3) carburetion tubes and devices,
(4) smoking and carburetion masks,
(5) roach clips, meaning objects used to hold burning
material, such as a marijuana cigarette, that has
become too small or too short to be held in the
hand,
(6) miniature cocaine spoons and cocaine vials,
(7) chamber pipes,
(8) carburetor pipes,
(9) electric pipes,
(10) air-driven pipes,
(11) chillums,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 6

(12) bongs, or
(13) ice pipes or chillers,
m. all hidden or novelty pipes, and
n. any pipe that has a tobacco bowl or chamber of less
than one-half (1/2) inch in diameter in which there is
any detectable residue of any controlled dangerous
substance as defined in this section or any other
substances not legal for possession or use;
provided, however, the term drug paraphernalia shall not include
separation gins intended for use in preparing tea or spice, clamps
used for constructing electrical equipment, water pipes designed for
ornamentation in which no detectable amount of an illegal substance
is found or pipes designed and used solely for smoking tobacco,
traditional pipes of an American Indian tribal religious ceremony,
antique pipes that are thirty (30) years of age or older, or drug
testing strips possessed by a person for purposes of determining the
presence of fentanyl or a fentanyl-related compound;
19. "Drug-dependent person" means a person who is using a
controlled dangerous substance and who is in a state of psychic or
physical dependence, or both, arising from administration of that
controlled dangerous substance on a continuous basis. Drug
dependence is characterized by behavioral and other responses which
include a strong compulsion to take the substance on a continuous
basis in order to experience its psychic effects, or to avoid the
discomfort of its absence;
20. "Harm-reduction services" means programs established to:
a. reduce the spread of infectious diseases related to
injection drug use,
b. reduce drug dependency, overdose deaths, and
associated complications, and
c. increase safe recovery and disposal of used syringes
and sharp waste;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 7

21. "Hazardous materials" means materials, whether solid,
liquid, or gas, which are toxic to human, animal, aquatic, or plant
life, and the disposal of such materials is controlled by state or
federal guidelines;
22. "Home care agency" means any sole proprietorship,
partnership, association, corporation, or other organization which
administers, offers, or provides home care services, for a fee or
pursuant to a contract for such services, to clients in their place
of residence;
23. "Home care services" means skilled or personal care
services provided to clients in their place of residence for a fee;
24. "Hospice" means a centrally administered, nonprofit or for-
profit, medically directed, nurse-coordinated program which provides
a continuum of home and inpatient care for the terminally ill
patient and the patient's family. Such term shall also include a
centrally administered, nonprofit or for-profit, medically directed,
nurse-coordinated program if such program is licensed pursuant to
the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.
A hospice program offers palliative and supportive care to meet the
special needs arising out of the physical, emotional and spiritual
stresses which are experienced during the final stages of illness
and during dying and bereavement. This care is available twenty-
four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week, and is provided on the
basis of need, regardless of ability to pay. "Class A" Hospice
refers to Medicare-certified hospices. "Class B" refers to all
other providers of hospice services;
25. "Imitation controlled substance" means a substance that is
not a controlled dangerous substance, which by dosage unit
appearance, color, shape, size, markings or by representations made,
would lead a reasonable person to believe that the substance is a
controlled dangerous substance, or is a drug intended solely for
veterinary purposes that is not a controlled dangerous substance and
is being used outside of the scope of practice or normal course of
business, as defined by the State Board of Veterinary Medical
Examiners, or is a federal Food and Drug Administration-approved
drug that is not a controlled dangerous substance and is being used
outside the scope of approval for illicit purposes such as
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 8

adulterating or lacing other controlled dangerous substances. In
the event the appearance of the dosage unit or use is not reasonably
sufficient to establish that the substance is an imitation
controlled substance, the court or authority concerned should
consider, in addition to all other factors, the following factors:
a. statements made by an owner or by any other person in
control of the substance concerning the nature of the
substance, or its use or effect,
b. statements made to the recipient that the substance
may be resold for inordinate profit,
c. whether the substance is packaged in a manner normally
used for illicit controlled substances,
d. evasive tactics or actions utilized by the owner or
person in control of the substance to avoid detection
by law enforcement authorities,
e. prior convictions, if any, of an owner, or any other
person in control of the object, under state or
federal law related to controlled substances or fraud,
and
f. the proximity of the substances to controlled
dangerous substances;
26. "Immediate precursor" means a substance which the Director
has found to be and by regulation designates as being the principal
compound commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is
an immediate chemical intermediary used, or likely to be used, in
the manufacture of a controlled dangerous substance, the control of
which is necessary to prevent, curtail or limit such manufacture;
27. "Initial prescription" means a prescription issued to a
patient who:
a. has never previously been issued a prescription for
the drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent in the past
year, or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 9

b. requires a prescription for the drug or its
pharmaceutical equivalent due to a surgical procedure
or new acute event and has previously had a
prescription for the drug or its pharmaceutical
equivalent within the past year.
When determining whether a patient was previously issued a
prescription for a drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent, the
practitioner shall consult with the patient and review the medical
record and prescription monitoring information of the patient;
28. "Isomer" means the optical isomer, except as used in
subsections C and F of Section 2-204 of this title and paragraph 4
of subsection A of Section 2-206 of this title. As used in
subsections C and F of Section 2-204 of this title, isomer means the
optical, positional, or geometric isomer. As used in paragraph 4 of
subsection A of Section 2-206 of this title, the term isomer means
the optical or geometric isomer;
29. "Laboratory" means a laboratory approved by the Director as
proper to be entrusted with the custody of controlled dangerous
substances and the use of controlled dangerous substances for
scientific and medical purposes and for purposes of instruction;
30. "Manufacture" means the production, preparation,
propagation, compounding or processing of a controlled dangerous
substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from
substances of natural or synthetic origin, or independently by means
of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and chemical
synthesis. "Manufacturer" includes any person who packages,
repackages or labels any container of any controlled dangerous
substance, except practitioners who dispense or compound
prescription orders for delivery to the ultimate consumer;
31. "Marijuana" means all parts of the Cannabis plant Cannabis
sativa L., whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of such plant; and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such
plant, its seeds, or resin; tetrahydrocannabinols, neutral
compounds, and their corresponding acids, including synthetic
equivalents of the substances contained in the Cannabis plant or in
the resinous extractives of Cannabis, or synthetic substances,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 10

derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity, but shall not include:
a. the mature stalks of such plant or fiber produced from
such stalks,
b. oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant,
including cannabidiol derived from the seeds of the
marijuana plant,
c. any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture or preparation of such mature stalks (except
the resin extracted therefrom), including cannabidiol
derived from mature stalks, fiber, oil or cake,
d. the sterilized seed of such plant which is incapable
of germination,
e. for any person participating in a clinical trial to
administer cannabidiol for the treatment of severe
forms of epilepsy pursuant to Section 2-802 of this
title, a drug or substance approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration for use by those
participants,
f. for any person or the parents, legal guardians or
caretakers of the person who have received a written
certification from a physician licensed in this state
that the person has been diagnosed by a physician as
having Lennox-Gastaut syndrome, Dravet syndrome, also
known as severe myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, or any
other severe form of epilepsy that is not adequately
treated by traditional medical therapies, spasticity
due to multiple sclerosis or due to paraplegia,
intractable nausea and vomiting, appetite stimulation
with chronic wasting diseases, the substance
cannabidiol, a nonpsychoactive cannabinoid, found in
the Cannabis plant Cannabis sativa L. or any other
preparation thereof, that has a tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) and that is delivered to the patient in
the form of a liquid,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 11

g. any federal Food and Drug Administration-approved drug
or substance, or
h. industrial hemp, from the Cannabis plant Cannabis
sativa L. and any part of such plant, whether growing
or not, with a combined delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid concentration not more
than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-
weight basis, as tested using post-decarboxylation or
other similarly reliable methods, which shall only be
grown pursuant to the Oklahoma Industrial Hemp Program
and may be shipped intrastate and interstate;
32. "Medical purpose" means an intention to utilize a
controlled dangerous substance for physical or mental treatment, for
diagnosis, or for the prevention of a disease condition not in
violation of any state or federal law and not for the purpose of
satisfying physiological or psychological dependence or other abuse;
33. "Mid-level practitioner" means an Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse as defined and within parameters specified in
Section 567.3a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a certified
animal euthanasia technician as defined in Section 698.2 of Title 59
of the Oklahoma Statutes, or an animal control officer registered by
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control
under subsection B of Section 2-301 of this title within the
parameters of such officer's duties under Sections 501 through 508
of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether
produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis,
or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
a. opium, coca leaves and opiates,
b. a compound, manufacture, salt, derivative or
preparation of opium, coca leaves or opiates,
c. cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and
salts of isomers,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 12

d. ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers and
salts of isomers, and
e. a substance, and any compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative or preparation thereof, which is chemically
identical with any of the substances referred to in
subparagraphs a through d of this paragraph, except
that the words narcotic drug as used in Section 2-101
et seq. of this title shall not include decocainized
coca leaves or extracts of coca leaves, which extracts
do not contain cocaine or ecgonine;
35. "Opiate" or "opioid" means any Schedule II, III, IV or V
substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a
drug having such addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. The terms do not include, unless specifically designated
as controlled under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act,
the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methyl-morphinan and its
salts (dextromethorphan). The terms do include the racemic and
levorotatory forms;
36. "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver
somniferum L., except the seeds thereof;
37. "Palliative care" means a specialized medical service for
people of any age and at any stage of a serious illness or life-
altering medical event that focuses on navigating complex medical
decisions while providing patient autonomy and access to
information. Utilizing a holistic and interdisciplinary team
approach, palliative care addresses physical, intellectual,
emotional, social, and spiritual needs. Palliative care may be
provided in the inpatient, outpatient, or home care setting and
strives to improve quality of life for both the patient and the
family;
38. "Patient-provider agreement" means a written contract or
agreement that is executed between a practitioner and a patient
prior to the commencement of treatment for chronic pain using an
opioid drug as a means to:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 13

a. explain the possible risk of development of physical
or psychological dependence in the patient and prevent
the possible development of addiction,
b. document the understanding of both the practitioner
and the patient regarding the patient-provider
agreement of the patient,
c. establish the rights of the patient in association
with treatment and the obligations of the patient in
relation to the responsible use, discontinuation of
use, and storage of opioid drugs, including any
restrictions on the refill of prescriptions or the
acceptance of opioid prescriptions from practitioners,
d. identify the specific medications and other modes of
treatment, including physical therapy or exercise,
relaxation, or psychological counseling, that are
included as a part of the patient-provider agreement,
e. specify the measures the practitioner may employ to
monitor the compliance of the patient including, but
not limited to, random specimen screens and pill
counts, and
f. delineate the process for terminating the agreement,
including the consequences if the practitioner has
reason to believe that the patient is not complying
with the terms of the agreement. Compliance with the
consent items described in this paragraph shall
constitute a valid, informed consent for opioid
therapy. The practitioner shall be held harmless from
civil litigation for failure to treat pain if the
event occurs because of nonadherence by the patient
with any of the provisions of the patient-provider
agreement;
39. "Peace officer" means a police officer, sheriff, deputy
sheriff, district attorney's investigator, investigator from the
Office of the Attorney General, or any other person elected or
appointed by law to enforce any of the criminal laws of this state
or of the United States;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 14

40. "Person" means an individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity;
41. "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the
opium poppy, after mowing;
42. "Practitioner" means:
a. (1) a medical doctor or osteopathic physician,
(2) a dentist,
(3) a podiatrist,
(4) an optometrist,
(5) a veterinarian,
(6) an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse under the
supervision of a licensed medical doctor or
osteopathic physician, or a physician assistant,
(7) a scientific investigator, or
(8) any other person,
licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to
prescribe, distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to, use for scientific purposes or administer
a controlled dangerous substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state, or
b. a pharmacy, hospital, laboratory or other institution
licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect
to, use for scientific purposes or administer a
controlled dangerous substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 15

43. "Production" includes the manufacture, planting,
cultivation, growing or harvesting of a controlled dangerous
substance;
44. "Serious illness" means a medical illness or physical
injury or condition that substantially affects quality of life for
more than a short period of time. Serious illness includes, but is
not limited to, Alzheimer's disease or related dementias, lung
disease, cancer, heart failure, renal failure, liver failure, or
chronic, unremitting, or intractable pain such as neuropathic pain;
45. "State" means the State of Oklahoma or any other state of
the United States;
46. "Straw person" or "straw party", also known as a "front",
means a third party who:
a. is put up in name only to take part in a transaction
or otherwise is a nominal party to a transaction with
no actual control,
b. acts on behalf of another person to obtain title to
property and executes documents and instruments the
principal may direct respecting property, or
c. purchases property for another for the purpose of
concealing the identity of the real purchaser or to
accomplish some purpose otherwise in violation of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
47. "Surgical procedure" means a procedure that is performed
for the purpose of structurally altering the human body by incision
or destruction of tissues as part of the practice of medicine. This
term includes the diagnostic or therapeutic treatment of conditions
or disease processes by use of instruments such as lasers,
ultrasound, ionizing, radiation, scalpels, probes, or needles that
cause localized alteration or transportation of live human tissue by
cutting, burning, vaporizing, freezing, suturing, probing, or
manipulating by closed reduction for major dislocations or
fractures, or otherwise altering by any mechanical, thermal, light-
based, electromagnetic, or chemical means;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 16

48. a. "Synthetic controlled substance" means a substance:
(1) the chemical structure of which is substantially
similar to the chemical structure of a controlled
dangerous substance in Schedule I or II,
(2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system that is substantially similar to or
greater than the stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled dangerous substance in
Schedule I or II, or
(3) with respect to a particular person, which such
person represents or intends to have a stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially
similar to or greater than the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled dangerous
substance in Schedule I or II.
b. The designation of gamma-butyrolactone or any other
chemical as a precursor, pursuant to Section 2-322 of
this title, does not preclude a finding pursuant to
subparagraph a of this paragraph that the chemical is
a synthetic controlled substance.
c. Synthetic controlled substance does not include:
(1) a controlled dangerous substance,
(2) any substance for which there is an approved new
drug application,
(3) with respect to a particular person any
substance, if an exemption is in effect for
investigational use, for that person under the
provisions of Section 505 of the Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C., Section 355,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 17

to the extent conduct with respect to such
substance is pursuant to such exemption, or
(4) any substance to the extent not intended for
human consumption before such an exemption takes
effect with respect to that substance.
d. Prima facie evidence that a substance containing
salvia divinorum has been enhanced, concentrated, or
chemically or physically altered shall give rise to a
rebuttable presumption that the substance is a
synthetic controlled substance;
49. "Tetrahydrocannabinols" means includes all substances that
have been chemically synthesized to emulate the
tetrahydrocannabinols of marijuana, specifically including any
tetrahydrocannabinols derived from industrial hemp; and
50. "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a
controlled dangerous substance for the person's own use or for the
use of a member of the person's household or for administration to
an animal owned by the person or by a member of the person's
household.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-204, as
last amended by Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 3767 of the 2nd
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2-204. The controlled substances listed in this section
are included in Schedule I and include any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following
hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation.
A. Any of the following opiates including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these isomers,
esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 18

1. Acetylmethadol;
2. Allylprodine;
3. Alphacetylmethadol;
4. Alphameprodine;
5. Alphamethadol;
6. Benzethidine;
7. Betacetylmethadol;
8. Betameprodine;
9. Betamethadol;
10. Betaprodine;
11. Clonitazene;
12. Dextromoramide;
13. Dextrorphan (except its methyl ether);
14. Diampromide;
15. Diethylthiambutene;
16. Dimenoxadol;
17. Dimepheptanol;
18. Dimethylthiambutene;
19. Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
20. Dipipanone;
21. Ethylmethylthiambutene;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 19

22. Etonitazene;
23. Etoxeridine;
24. Furethidine;
25. Hydroxypethidine;
26. Isotonitazene;
27. Ketobemidone;
28. Levomoramide;
29. Levophenacylmorphan;
30. Metonitazene;
31. Morpheridine;
32. N-desethyl isotonitazene;
33. N-pyrrolidino protonitazene;
34. Noracymethadol;
35. Norlevorphanol;
36. Normethadone;
37. Norpipanone;
38. Phenadoxone;
39. Phenampromide;
40. Phenomorphan;
41. Phenoperidine;
42. Piritramide;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 20

43. Proheptazine;
44. Properidine;
45. Protonitazene;
46. Racemoramide; or
47. Trimeperidine.
B. Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, when
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Acetorphine;
2. Acetyldihydrocodeine;
3. Benzylmorphine;
4. Codeine methylbromide;
5. Codeine-N-Oxide;
6. Cyprenorphine;
7. Desomorphine;
8. Dihydromorphine;
9. Etorphine;
10. Heroin;
11. Hydromorphinol;
12. Methyldesorphine;
13. Methylhydromorphine;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 21

14. Morphine methylbromide;
15. Morphine methylsulfonate;
16. Morphine-N-Oxide;
17. Myrophine;
18. Nicocodeine;
19. Nicomorphine;
20. Normorphine;
21. Phoclodine;
22. Thebacon;
23. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide
(Acetyl fentanyl);
24. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butenamide
(Crotonyl fentanyl);
25. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-
furancarboxamide (Furanyl fentanyl);
26. N-phenyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinamine (4-ANPP);
27. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (Cyclopropyl fentanyl); or
28. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butanamide
(Butyrl fentanyl).
C. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances,
their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
excepted, when the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Methcathinone;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 22

2. 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
3. 3, 4-methylenedioxy methamphetamine;
4. 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
5. 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
6. Bufotenine;
7. Diethyltryptamine;
8. Dimethyltryptamine;
9. 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
10. Ibogaine;
11. Lysergic acid diethylamide;
12. Marijuana;
13. Mescaline;
14. N-benzylpiperazine;
15. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
16. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
17. Psilocybin;
18. Psilocyn;
19. 2, 5 dimethoxyamphetamine;
20. 4 Bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
21. 4 methoxyamphetamine;
22. Cyclohexamine;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 23

23. Salvia Divinorum;
24. Salvinorin A;
25. Thiophene Analog of Phencyclidine. Also known as: 1-(1-
(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl) piperidine; 2-Thienyl Analog of
Phencyclidine; TPCP, TCP;
26. Phencyclidine (PCP);
27. Pyrrolidine Analog for Phencyclidine. Also known as 1-(1-
Phenylcyclohexyl) - Pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
28. 1-(3-trifluoromethylphenyl) piperazine;
29. Flunitrazepam;
30. B-hydroxy-amphetamine;
31. B-ketoamphetamine;
32. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitroamphetamine;
33. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine;
34. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine;
35. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine;
36. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine;
37. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine;
38. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine;
39. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-fluorophenethylamine;
40. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine;
41. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylthio-phenethylamine;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 24

42. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-isopropylthio-phenethylamine;
43. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-propylthio-phenethylamine;
44. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-cyclopropylmethylthio-phenethylamine;
45. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-tert-butylthio-phenethylamine;
46. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(2-fluoroethylthio)-phenethylamine;
47. 5-methoxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine;
48. N-methyltryptamine;
49. A-ethyltryptamine;
50. A-methyltryptamine;
51. N, N-diethyltryptamine;
52. N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
53. N, N-dipropyltryptamine;
54. 5-methoxy-a-methyltryptamine;
55. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diethyltryptamine;
56. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
57. 5-methoxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
58. 4-hydroxy-N-isopropyl-N-methyltryptamine;
59. 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (Methylone);
60. 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV);
61. 3-Methylmethcathinone (Metaphedrone);
62. 4-Methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone);
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 25

63. 4-methoxymethcathinone;
64. 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
65. 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
66. 1-(8-bromobenzo 1,2-b;4,5-b’ difuran-4-yl)-2-aminopropane;
67. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine;
68. 4-Methylethcathinone;
69. Pyrovalerone;
70. N,N-diallyl-5-methoxytryptamine;
71. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone (Ethylone);
72. B-keto-N-Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine (Butylone);
73. B-keto-Methylbenzodioxolylpentanamine (Pentylone);
74. Alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiophenone;
75. 4-Fluoroamphetamine;
76. Pentedrone;
77. 4’-Methyl-a-pyrrolidinohexaphenone;
78. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine;
79. 2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
80. 1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine;
81. N,N-Dimethylamphetamine;
82. 4-Fluoromethamphetamine;
83. 4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25C-NBOMe);
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 26

84. 4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25I-NBOMe);
85. 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzy)phenethylamine
(25B-NBOMe);
86. 1-(4-Fluorophenyl)piperazine;
87. Methoxetamine;
88. 3,4-dichloro-N[2-dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide;
89. N-ethyl hexadrone;
90. Isopropyl-U-47700;
91. Para-fluorobutyrl fentanyl;
92. Para-fluorofentanyl (pFF);
93. Fluoro isobutryrl fentanyl;
94. 3-Hydroxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
95. 3-methoxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
96. Flualprazolam; or
97. Flubromazolam; or
98. Tetrahydrocannabinols.
D. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in a different
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having stimulant
or depressant effect on the central nervous system:
1. Fenethylline;
2. Mecloqualone;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 27

3. N-ethylamphetamine;
4. Methaqualone;
5. Gamma-Hydroxybutyric Acid, also known as GHB, gamma-
hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium
oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate;
6. Gamma-Butyrolactone (GBL) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption, with the exception
of legitimate food additive and manufacturing purposes;
7. Gamma Hydroxyvalerate (GHV) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
8. Gamma Valerolactone (GVL) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
9. 1,4 Butanediol (1,4 BD or BDO) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption with the exception
of legitimate manufacturing purposes;
10. N-ethylpentylone;
11. Adinazolam;
12. Meclonazepam;
13. N-methylclonazepam;
14. Bromazolam;
15. Flunitrazolam;
16. Nitrazolam;
17. Pyrazolam;
18. Zapizolam;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 28

19. N-propionitrile chlorphine;
20. 5,6-dichloro desmethylchlorphine; or
21. Phenazolam.
E. 1. The following industrial uses of Gamma-Butyrolactone,
Gamma Hydroxyvalerate, Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol are
excluded from all schedules of controlled substances under this
title:
a. pesticides,
b. photochemical etching,
c. electrolytes of small batteries or capacitors,
d. viscosity modifiers in polyurethane,
e. surface etching of metal coated plastics,
f. organic paint disbursements for water soluble inks,
g. pH regulators in the dyeing of wool and polyamide
fibers,
h. foundry chemistry as a catalyst during curing,
i. curing agents in many coating systems based on
urethanes and amides,
j. additives and flavoring agents in food, confectionary,
and beverage products,
k. synthetic fiber and clothing production,
l. tetrahydrofuran production,
m. gamma butyrolactone production,
n. polybutylene terephthalate resin production,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 29

o. polyester raw materials for polyurethane elastomers
and foams,
p. coating resin raw material, and
q. as an intermediate in the manufacture of other
chemicals and pharmaceuticals.
2. At the request of any person, the Director of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control may exempt any
other product containing Gamma-Butyrolactone, Gamma Hydroxyvalerate,
Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol from being included as a
Schedule I controlled substance if such product is labeled,
marketed, manufactured, and distributed for legitimate industrial
use in a manner that reduces or eliminates the likelihood of abuse.
3. In making a determination regarding an industrial product,
the Director, after notice and hearing, shall consider the
following:
a. the history and current pattern of abuse,
b. the name and labeling of the product,
c. the intended manner of distribution, advertising, and
promotion of the product, and
d. other factors as may be relevant to and consistent
with the public health and safety.
4. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the procedures
of the Administrative Procedures Act.
F. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation, whether
produced directly or indirectly from a substance of vegetable origin
or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination
of extraction and chemical synthesis, that contains any quantity of
the following substances, or that contains any of their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of these salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 30

1. JWH-004;
2. JWH-007;
3. JWH-009;
4. JWH-015;
5. JWH-016;
6. JWH-018;
7. JWH-019;
8. JWH-020;
9. JWH-030;
10. JWH-046;
11. JWH-047;
12. JWH-048;
13. JWH-049;
14. JWH-050;
15. JWH-070;
16. JWH-071;
17. JWH-072;
18. JWH-073;
19. JWH-076;
20. JWH-079;
21. JWH-080;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 31

22. JWH-081;
23. JWH-082;
24. JWH-094;
25. JWH-096;
26. JWH-098;
27. JWH-116;
28. JWH-120;
29. JWH-122;
30. JWH-145;
31. JWH-146;
32. JWH-147;
33. JWH-148;
34. JWH-149;
35. JWH-150;
36. JWH-156;
37. JWH-167;
38. JWH-175;
39. JWH-180;
40. JWH-181;
41. JWH-182;
42. JWH-184;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 32

43. JWH-185;
44. JWH-189;
45. JWH-192;
46. JWH-193;
47. JWH-194;
48. JWH-195;
49. JWH-196;
50. JWH-197;
51. JWH-198;
52. JWH-199;
53. JWH-200;
54. JWH-201;
55. JWH-202;
56. JWH-203;
57. JWH-204;
58. JWH-205;
59. JWH-206;
60. JWH-207;
61. JWH-208;
62. JWH-209;
63. JWH-210;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 33

64. JWH-211;
65. JWH-212;
66. JWH-213;
67. JWH-234;
68. JWH-235;
69. JWH-236;
70. JWH-237;
71. JWH-239;
72. JWH-240;
73. JWH-241;
74. JWH-242;
75. JWH-243;
76. JWH-244;
77. JWH-245;
78. JWH-246;
79. JWH-248;
80. JWH-249;
81. JWH-250;
82. JWH-251;
83. JWH-252;
84. JWH-253;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 34

85. JWH-262;
86. JWH-292;
87. JWH-293;
88. JWH-302;
89. JWH-303;
90. JWH-304;
91. JWH-305;
92. JWH-306;
93. JWH-307;
94. JWH-308;
95. JWH-311;
96. JWH-312;
97. JWH-313;
98. JWH-314;
99. JWH-315;
100. JWH-316;
101. JWH-346;
102. JWH-348;
103. JWH-363;
104. JWH-364;
105. JWH-365;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 35

106. JWH-367;
107. JWH-368;
108. JWH-369;
109. JWH-370;
110. JWH-371;
111. JWH-373;
112. JWH-386;
113. JWH-387;
114. JWH-392;
115. JWH-394;
116. JWH-395;
117. JWH-397;
118. JWH-398;
119. JWH-399;
120. JWH-400;
121. JWH-412;
122. JWH-413;
123. JWH-414;
124. JWH-415;
125. CP-55, 940;
126. CP-47, 497;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 36

127. HU-210;
128. HU-211;
129. WIN-55, 212-2;
130. AM-2201;
131. AM-2233;
132. JWH-018 adamantyl-carboxamide;
133. AKB48;
134. JWH-122 N-(4-pentenyl)analog;
135. MAM2201;
136. URB597;
137. URB602;
138. URB754;
139. UR144;
140. XLR11;
141. A-796,260;
142. STS-135;
143. AB-FUBINACA;
144. AB-PINACA;
145. PB-22;
146. AKB48 N-5-Fluorpentyl;
147. AM1248;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 37

148. FUB-PB-22;
149. ADB-FUBINACA;
150. BB-22;
151. 5-Fluoro PB-22; or
152. 5-Fluoro AKB-48.
G. In addition to those substances listed in subsection F of
this section, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of a synthetic cannabinoid found to be
in any of the following chemical groups:
1. Naphthoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl
ring to any extent. Naphthoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-
200),
b. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM2201),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-018),
d. 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-073),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-081),
f. 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-015),
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 38

g. 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-019),
h. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-122),
i. 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-210),
j. 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-398),
k. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-007),
l. 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-164),
m. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole
(JWH-098),
n. 1-pentyl-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-412),
o. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole (AM-1220),
p. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole
(MAM-2201), or
q. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM-2232);
2. Naphthylmethylindoles: any compound containing a 1H-indol-
3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with or without substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the
naphthyl ring to any extent. Naphthylmethylindoles include, but are
not limited to, (1-pentylindol-3-yl)(1-naphthyl)methane (JWH-175);
3. Naphthoylpyrroles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 39

morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the pyrrole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthoylpyrroles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-hexyl-2-phenyl-4-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147),
b. 1-pentyl-5-(2-methylphenyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
(JWH-370),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-030), or
d. 1-hexyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147);
4. Naphthylideneindenes: any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethylene)indene structure with or without substitution at
the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indene group to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthylmethylindenes include,
but are not limited to, (1-[(3-pentyl)-1H-inden-1-
ylidene)methyl]naphthalene (JWH-176);
5. Phenylacetylindoles: any compound containing a 3-
phenylacetylindole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
ring to any extent. Phenylacetylindoles include, but are not
limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-250),
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 40

b. 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole
(RCS-8),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole (JWH-203),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-251),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-201), or
f. 1-pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-302);
6. Cyclohexylphenols: any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with or without substitution at
the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, and whether or not further substituted
on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Cyclohexylphenols include,
but are not limited to:
a. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-
hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol (CP-47,497),
b. 5-(1,1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-
phenol (cannabicyclohexanol; CP-47,497 C8 homologue),
or
c. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,2R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-
hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-phenol (CP 55, 940);
7. Benzoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 41

group to any extent. Benzoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (RCS-4),
b. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-3-(4-
methoxybenzoyl)indole (Pravadoline or WIN 48, 098),
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-694),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-679), or
e. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-2233);
8. Cyclopropoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-
(cyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the
cyclopropoyl ring to any extent. Cyclopropoylindoles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole
(UR-144),
b. 1-(5-chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (5Cl-UR-144), or
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (XLR11);
9. Indole Amides: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxamide structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 42

(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxamide
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quninolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Amides include, but are not limited to:
a. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(2NE1),
b. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (STS-135),
c. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-
indole-3-carboxamide (ADBICA),
d. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-
fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (5F-ADBICA),
e. N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(NNE1),
f. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(naphthalene-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (5F-NNE1),
g. N-benzyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (SDB-006),
or
h. N-benzyl-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(5F-SDB-006);
10. Indole Esters: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxylate structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxylate
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 43

group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Esters include, but are not limited to:
a. quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-
22),
b. quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (5F-PB-22),
c. quinolin-8-yl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (BB-22),
d. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (FDU-PB-22), or
e. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (NM2201);
11. Adamantanoylindoles: Any compound containing an
adamantanyl-(1H-indol-3-yl)methanone structure with or without
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the
adamantyl ring to any extent. Adamantanoylindoles include, but are
not limited to:
a. adamantan-1-yl[1-[(1-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-1H-
indol-3-yl]methanone (AM1248), or
b. adamantan-1-yl-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone (AB-
001);
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 44

12. Carbazole Ketones: Any compound containing (9H-carbazole-
3-yl) methanone structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the carbazole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the
methanone group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl,
quinolinyl, cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-
3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-
methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether
or not further substituted at the carbazole, adamantyl, naphthyl,
phenyl, pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent.
Carbazole Ketones include, but are not limited to, naphthalen-1-
yl(9-pentyl-9H-carbazol-3-yl)methanone (EG-018);
13. Benzimidazole Ketones: Any compound containing
(benzimidazole-2-yl) methanone structure with or without
substitution at either nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole ring by an
alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the methanone
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the benzimidazole, adamantyl, naphthyl,
phenyl, pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent.
Benzimidazole Ketones include, but are not limited to:
a. naphthalen-1-yl(1-pentyl-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
l)methanone (JWH-018 benzimidazole analog), or
b. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone (FUBIMINA); and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 45

14. Modified by Replacement: any compound defined in this
subsection that is modified by replacement of a carbon with nitrogen
in the indole, naphthyl, indene, benzimidazole, or carbazole ring.
H. Any prescription drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration under the provisions of Section 505 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C., Section 355, that is
designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under
federal law by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration
shall be excluded from Schedule I and shall be prescribed,
distributed, dispensed, or used in accordance with federal law upon
the issuance of a notice, final rule, or interim final rule by the
United States Drug Enforcement Administration designating,
rescheduling, or deleting as a controlled substance such a drug
product under federal law, unless and until the State Board of
Pharmacy takes action pursuant to Section 2-201 of this title. If
the State Board of Pharmacy does not take action pursuant to Section
2-201 of this title, the drug product shall be deemed to be
designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance in
accordance with federal law and in compliance with the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-208, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-208. The controlled substances listed in this section
are included in Schedule III.
A. Unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation, which contains any quantity of the
following substances or any other substance having a potential for
abuse associated with a stimulant or depressant effect on the
central nervous system:
1. Any drug product containing gamma-hydroxybutyric acid,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an
application has been approved under Section 505 of the Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
2. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following hormonal substances or
steroids, including their salts, isomers, esters and salts of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 46

isomers and esters, when the existence of these salts, isomers,
esters, and salts of isomers and esters is possible within the
specific chemical designation:
a. Boldenone,
b. Chlorotestosterone,
c. Clostebol,
d. Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone,
e. Dihydrotestosterone,
f. Drostanolone,
g. Ethylestrenol,
h. Fluoxymesterone,
i. Formebolone,
j. Mesterolone,
k. Methandienone,
l. Methandranone,
m. Methandriol,
n. Methandrostenolone,
o. Methenolone,
p. Methyltestosterone, except as provided in subsection E
of this section,
q. Mibolerone,
r. Nandrolone,
s. Norethandrolone,
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 47

t. Oxandrolone,
u. Oxymesterone,
v. Oxymetholone,
w. Stanolone,
x. Stanozolol,
y. Testolactone,
z. Testosterone, except as provided in subsection E of
this section, and
aa. Trenbolone;
3. Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of
barbituric acid, or any salt of a derivative of barbituric acid;
4. Benzephetamine and its salts;
5. Buprenorphine;
6. Butalbital/acetaminophen/caffeine;
7. Chlorhexadol;
8. Chlorphentermine and its salts;
9. Clortermine;
10. Dronabinol;
11. Glutethimide;
11. 12. Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
12. 13. Lysergic acid;
13. 14. Lysergic acid amide;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 48

14. 15. Mazindol;
15. 16. Methyprylon;
16. 17. Phendimetrazine;
17. 18. Phenylacetone (P2P);
18. 19. Sulfondiethylmethane;
19. 20. Sulfonethylmethane;
20. 21. Sulfonmethane;
21. Tetrahydrocannibinols;
22. 1-Phenycyclohexylamine; or
23. 1-Piperidinocychexanecarbo nitrile (PCC).
Livestock implants as regulated by the Federal Food and Drug
Administration shall be exempt.
B. Nalorphine.
C. Unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the
following narcotic drugs, or any salts thereof:
1. Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of codeine or
any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than
ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater
quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;
2. Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of codeine or
any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than
ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active,
nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
3. Not more than one and eight-tenths (1.8) grams of
dihydrocodeine or any of its salts, per one hundred (100)
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 49

milliliters or not more than ninety (90) milligrams per dosage unit,
with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;
4. Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of
ethylmorphine or any of its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters
or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with one
or more ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
5. Not more than five hundred (500) milligrams of opium per one
hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred (100) grams, or not
more than twenty-five (25) milligrams per dosage unit, with one or
more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic
amounts; or
6. Not more than fifty (50) milligrams of morphine or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or per one hundred
(100) grams with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in
recognized therapeutic amounts.
D. The Board of Pharmacy may except by rule any compound,
mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant
substance listed in subsections A and B of this section from the
application of all or any part of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one
or more active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or
depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity,
proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of
the substances which have a stimulant or depressant effect on the
central nervous system.
E. The following hormonal substances or steroids are exempt
from classification as Schedule III controlled dangerous substances:
1. Estratest, containing 1.25 mg esterified estrogens and 2.5
mg methyltestosterone;
2. Estratest HS, containing 0.625 mg esterified estrogens and
1.25 mg methyltestosterone;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 50

3. Premarin with Methyltestosterone, containing 1.25 mg
conjugated estrogens and 10.0 mg methyltestosterone;
4. Premarin with Methyltestosterone, containing 0.625 mg
conjugated estrogens and 5.0 mg methyltestosterone;
5. Testosterone Cypionate - Estrodiol Cypionate injection,
containing 50 mg/ml Testosterone Cypionate; and
6. Testosterone Enanthate - Estradiol Valerate injection,
containing 90 mg/ml Testosterone Enanthate and 4 mg/ml Estradiol
Valerate.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 51

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1257 Page 52